Tennessee, session 114, SB0277.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-1-106(d), is amended by deleting
the language "business law and taxation" and substituting "taxation and regulation" and by
deleting the language "grading papers and".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0277
001394
- 1 -